Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Ordinances and Regulations

6-32-201. Form of ordinances.

Any action of the council having a regulatory or penal effect, relating to revenue or the expenditure of money, or required to be done by ordinance under this charter, shall be done only by ordinance. Each ordinance shall relate to a single subject, which shall be expressed in a title, and upon passage shall be further identified by a number and, if desirable, a short title. The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be: “Be it ordained by the Mayor and Council members of the City of (here insert name).” Other actions may be accomplished by resolutions or motions. Each motion, resolution and ordinance shall be in written form before being introduced.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.01; T.C.A., § 6-3211.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-32-202. Passage, amendment and repeal of ordinances.

Each ordinance, before being adopted, shall be read at two (2) meetings not less than one (1) week apart, and shall take effect ten (10) days after its adoption; provided, that, where an emergency exists and the public safety and welfare requires it, an ordinance containing a full statement of the facts and reasons for the emergency may be made effective upon its adoption if approved by a majority of the members of the council on two (2) readings on successive days. As used in this subsection (a), “read” means the reading of the caption of the ordinance.

At least the title and a brief summary of each ordinance, except an emergency ordinance, shall be published in the official city newspaper at least one (1) week before final passage, either separately or as part of the published proceedings of the council.

Amendments of ordinances and resolutions or parts thereof shall be accomplished only by setting forth the complete section, sections, subsection, or subsections in their amended form.

An ordinance may be repealed by reference to its number and title only and publication of the ordinance may be similarly limited.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.02; T.C.A., § 6-3212; Acts 1993, ch. 353, § 2.

Cross-References. Repeal of blue laws by referendum, § 6-32-208.

6-32-203. Ordinances granting permits to use, franchise, and special privileges.

Every proposed ordinance granting any permit or right to occupy or use the streets, highways, bridges, or public places in the city for any purpose or granting any franchise, exclusive contract or other special privilege shall remain on file with the clerk for public inspection for at least two (2) weeks before its final adoption in the complete form in which it is finally passed.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.03; T.C.A., § 6-3213.

6-32-204. Preservation and publication of ordinances.

All ordinances and their amendments shall be recorded by the clerk in a book to be known as the “ordinance book,” and it shall be the duty of the mayor and clerk to authenticate such records by their official signatures. A separate record shall be maintained for resolutions. The original copies of all ordinances, resolutions, and motions shall be filed and preserved by the city clerk.

At least an abstract of the essential provisions of each ordinance shall be published once in the official city newspaper within ten (10) days after its adoption, except that only the title shall be so published of any technical code adopted by reference.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.04; T.C.A., § 6-3214.

6-32-205. Codification of ordinances.

The council shall, within one (1) year after the adoption of this charter, and every ten (10) years thereafter, arrange for the codification of all ordinances and resolutions having a regulatory effect or of general application that are to be continued in force. Current loose-leaf editions of the official code shall be maintained and be made available for purchase by the public at a reasonable fee established by the council. The code shall carry notes and cumulative references indicating prior amendments to any section thereof. Copies of the official code may be certified by the city clerk, and when so certified shall be competent evidence in all courts and legally established tribunals as to the matters contained therein.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.05; T.C.A., § 6-3215.

6-32-206. Rules and regulations.

The council may by ordinance authorize the city manager to formulate and promulgate formal rules and regulations having regulatory effect or of general application on various matters, subject to such restrictions and standards of guidance as the council may prescribe. No such formal rule or regulation shall take effect until it is filed with the city clerk, who shall file and preserve the original copy in such clerk's office. Such rules and regulations shall be included as a separate section of the city code. Amendments of such rules and regulations shall be accomplished only by setting forth complete sections or subsections in their amended form.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.11; T.C.A., § 6-3216.

6-32-207. Rules of ordinance construction — Severability.

In the construction of the ordinances of the city, the following rules shall be observed, unless such construction would be inconsistent with the manifest intent of the council. If any portion of an ordinance or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is found to be invalid by a court, such invalidity shall not affect the remaining portions or applications of the ordinance that can be given effect without the invalid portion or application, provided such remaining portions are not determined by the court to be inoperable, and to this end ordinances are declared to be severable.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 5.12; T.C.A., § 6-3217.

6-32-208. Repeal of blue laws by referendum.

Any municipality having an ordinance prohibiting retail sales or deliveries of merchandise on Sunday may repeal the same by a referendum election for the ratification or rejection of the ordinance. The mayor and council by resolution may request the county election commission to hold a special or regular referendum election for the ratification or rejection of the Sunday ordinance; provided, that the county election commission receives the necessary resolution requesting the election at least thirty (30) days before the date on which the election is scheduled to be held.

At any such election, the only question submitted to the voters shall be in the following form:

“For ordinance prohibiting sale or delivery of retail merchandise on Sunday.

Against ordinance prohibiting sale or delivery of retail merchandise on Sunday.”

The election commission shall certify the result to the mayor and council of the municipality. If a majority of those voting in the referendum favor repeal, the ordinance thereby shall be repealed. If a majority of those voting in the referendum oppose repeal, the ordinance shall continue in effect until legally amended or repealed.

A referendum on this subject shall not be held more than once every twelve (12) months from the date of election.

Acts 1984, ch. 592, § 1.

Cross-References. Repeal of ordinances, § 6-32-202.